North Carolina, session 2025, HB221.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. The Town of Tabor City is authorized to participate in State and federal
railroad revitalization programs necessary to ensure continued or improved rail service to the
Town as authorized in Article 2D of Chapter 136 of the General Statutes. The Town is authorized
to enter into contracts with the North Carolina Department of Transportation to provide for the
nonfederal matching funds for railroad revitalization programs. Such funds may be comprised of
State funds distributed under the provisions of G.S. 136-44.38 and of Town funds. Subject to the
provisions of G.S. 160A-209(d), the Town is authorized to levy local property taxes for railroad
revitalization programs. Town funds for any project authorized by this act may not exceed ten
percent (10%) of total project costs.
SECTION 2. This act applies only to the Town of Tabor City.
SECTION 3. This act is effective when it becomes law.
*H221-v-1*